Utah statutes.
76-10-1304.   Aiding prostitution.

(1)  A person is guilty of aiding prostitution if the person:

(a) (i)  solicits a person to patronize a prostitute;

(ii)  procures or attempts to procure a prostitute for a patron; or

(iii)  leases or otherwise permits a place controlled by the actor, alone or in association with another, to be used for prostitution or the promotion of prostitution; or

(iv)  provides any service or commits any act that enables another person to commit a violation of this Subsection (1)(a) or facilitates another person's ability to commit any violation of this Subsection (1)(a); or

(b)  solicits, receives, or agrees to receive any benefit for committing any of the acts prohibited by Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  Aiding prostitution is a class B misdemeanor.  However, a person who is convicted a second time, and on all subsequent convictions, under this section or under a local ordinance adopted in compliance with Section 76-10-1307 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

